Washington statutes.
RCW 7.06.010

Authorization.

In counties with a population of more than one hundred thousand, arbitration of civil actions under this chapter shall be required. In counties with a population of one hundred thousand or less, the superior court of the county, by majority vote of the judges thereof, or the county legislative authority may authorize arbitration of civil actions under this chapter.

[ 2018 c 36 s 1; 2005 c 472 s 1; 2002 c 338 s 1; 1991 c 363 s 7; 1984 c 258 s 511; 1979 c 103 s 1.]

NOTES:

Applicability—Effective date—2018 c 36: See notes following RCW 7.06.043.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.